District of Columbia statutes.
7-1131.09

Appointment and duties of Consumer and Family Affairs Officer.

The Department shall have a Consumer and Family Affairs officer, appointed by the Director, and qualified by experience and training to carry out the following functions:

(1)

Ensuring the involvement of consumers of mental health services and their family members in the design, implementation, and evaluation of mental health services and mental health supports;

(2)

Serving as a liaison to consumers of mental health services and their family members and personal representatives; and

(3)

Promoting the protection of the rights of consumers of mental health services.

Dec. 18, 2001, D.C. Law 14-56, § 109, 48 DCR 7674

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 9 of Department of Mental Health Establishment Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-51, October 30, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 10807).

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 9 of Department of Mental Health Establishment Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-55, May 2, 2001, 48 DCR 4390).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 9 of Department of Mental Health Establishment Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-101, July 23, 2001, 48 DCR 7123).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 109 of Mental Health Service Delivery Reform Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-144, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 9947).